Utah statutes.
52-4-207.   Electronic meetings -- Authorization -- Requirements.
(1)  A public body may convene and conduct an electronic meeting in accordance
with this section.
(2) (a)  A public body may not hold an electronic meeting unless the public
body has adopted a resolution, rule, or ordinance governing the use of
electronic meetings.
(b)  The resolution, rule, or ordinance may:
(i)  prohibit or limit electronic meetings based on budget, public policy, or
logistical considerations;
(ii)  require a quorum of the public body to:
(A)  be present at a single anchor location for the meeting; and
(B)  vote to approve establishment of an electronic meeting in order to
include other members of the public body through an electronic connection;
(iii)  require a request for an electronic meeting to be made by a member of a
public body up to three days prior to the meeting to allow for arrangements to
be made for the electronic meeting;
(iv)  restrict the number of separate connections for members of the public
body that are allowed for an electronic meeting based on available equipment
capability; or
(v)  establish other procedures, limitations, or conditions governing
electronic meetings not in conflict with this section.
(3)  A public body that convenes or conducts an electronic meeting shall:
(a)  give public notice of the meeting:
(i)  in accordance with Section 52-4-202; and
(ii)  post written notice at the anchor location;
(b)  in addition to giving public notice required by Subsection (3)(a),
provide:
(i)  notice of the electronic meeting to the members of the public body at
least 24 hours before the meeting so that they may participate in and be
counted as present for all purposes, including the determination that a quorum
is present; and
(ii)  a description of how the members will be connected to the electronic
meeting;
(c)  establish one or more anchor locations for the public meeting, at least
one of which is in the building and political subdivision where the public
body would normally meet if they were not holding an electronic meeting;
(d)  provide space and facilities at the anchor location so that interested
persons and the public may attend and monitor the open portions of the
meeting; and
(e)  if comments from the public will be accepted during the electronic
meeting, provide space and facilities at the anchor location so that
interested persons and the public may attend, monitor, and participate in the
open portions of the meeting.
(4)  Compliance with the provisions of this section by a public body
constitutes full and complete compliance by the public body with the
corresponding provisions of Sections 52-4-201 and 52-4-202.
